California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(f) Any of the notices required to be given under this section or Sections 290.1 and 290.2 may be waived by a party in person or through his or her attorney, or by a signed written waiver filed on or before the date scheduled for the hearing.

(g) If it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined in Section 224.1, notice shall be given in accordance with Section 224.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 11.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

292.

The social worker or probation officer shall give notice of the review hearing held pursuant to Section 364 in the following manner:

(a) Notice of the hearing shall be given to the following persons:

(1) The mother.

(2) The presumed father or any father receiving services.

(3) The legal guardian or guardians.

(4) The Indian custodian, if it is known that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1.

(5) The child, if the child is 10 years of age or
 older.

(6) The child’s tribe, if known, and it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1.

(7) Any known sibling of the child who is the subject of the hearing if that sibling either is the subject of a dependency proceeding or has been adjudged to be a dependent child of the juvenile court. If the sibling is 10 years of age or older, the sibling, the sibling’s caregiver, and the sibling’s attorney. If the sibling is under 10 years of age, the sibling’s caregiver and the sibling’s attorney. However, notice is not required to be given to any sibling whose matter is calendared in the same court on the same day.

(8) Each attorney of record, if that attorney was not present at the time that the hearing was set by the court.

(b) No notice is required for a parent whose parental rights have been terminated.

(c) The notice of the hearing shall be served not earlier than 30 days, nor later than 15 days, before the hearing.

(d) The notice shall contain a statement regarding the nature of the hearing to be held and any change in the custody or status of the child being recommended by the supervising agency. The notice shall also include a statement that the child and the parent or parents or legal guardian or guardians have a right to be present at the hearing, to be represented by counsel at the hearing and the procedure for obtaining appointed counsel, and to present evidence regarding the proper disposition of the case. The notice shall also state that if the parent or parents or legal guardian or guardians fail to appear, the court may proceed
 without them.

(e) Service of the notice shall be by personal service, by first-class mail, or by certified mail with return receipt requested, addressed to the last known address of the person to be noticed, or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 12.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

293.

The social worker or probation officer shall give notice of the review hearings held pursuant to Section 366.21, 366.22, or 366.25 in the following manner:

(a) Notice of the hearing shall be given to the following persons:

(1) The mother.

(2) The presumed father or any father receiving services.

(3) The legal guardian or guardians.

(4) The Indian custodian, if it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1.

(5) The
 child, if the child is 10 years of age or older.

(6) The child’s tribe, if known, and it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1.

(7) Any known sibling of the child who is the subject of the hearing if that sibling either is the subject of a dependency proceeding or has been adjudged to be a dependent child of the juvenile court. If the sibling is 10 years of age or older, the sibling, the sibling’s caregiver, and the sibling’s attorney. If the sibling is under 10 years of age, the sibling’s caregiver and the sibling’s attorney. However, notice is not required to be given to any sibling whose matter is calendared in the same court on the same day.

(8) In the case of a child removed from the physical custody of his or her parent or legal guardian, the current
 caregiver of the child, including the foster parents, relative caregivers, preadoptive parents, nonrelative extended family members, resource family, community care facility, or foster family agency having custody of the child. In a case in which a foster family agency is notified of the hearing pursuant to this section, and the child resides in a foster home certified by the foster family agency, the foster family agency shall provide timely notice of the hearing to the child’s caregivers.

(9) Each attorney of record if that attorney was not present at the time that the hearing was set by the court.

(b) No notice is required for a parent whose parental rights have been terminated. On and after January 1, 2012, in the case of a nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, no notice is required for a parent.

(c) The notice of hearing shall be served not earlier than 30 days, nor later than 15 days, before the hearing.

(d) The notice shall contain a statement regarding the nature of the hearing to be held and any change in the custody or status of the child being recommended by the supervising agency. If the notice is to the child, parent or parents, or legal guardian or guardians, the notice shall also advise them of the right to be present, the right to be represented by counsel, the right to request counsel, and the right to present evidence. The notice shall also state that if the parent or parents or legal guardian or guardians fail to appear, the court may proceed without them.

(e) Service of the notice shall be by first-class mail addressed to the last known address of the person to be noticed, by personal service, or by
 electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.

(f) Notice to the current caregiver of the child, including a foster parent, a relative caregiver, a preadoptive parent, a nonrelative extended family member, a resource family, a certified foster parent who has been approved for adoption, or the State Department of Social Services when it is acting as an adoption agency or by a county adoption agency, shall indicate that the person notified may attend all hearings or may submit any information he or she deems relevant to the court in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 13.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

294.

The social worker or probation officer shall give notice of a selection and implementation hearing held pursuant to Section 366.26 in the following manner:

(a) Notice of the hearing shall be given to the following persons:

(1) The mother.

(2) The fathers, presumed and alleged.

(3) The Indian custodian, if it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child as defined by Section
 224.1.

(4) The child, if the child is 10 years of age or older.

(5) The child’s tribe, if known, and any tribe in which the child may be a member or eligible for membership if the specific tribe is not known, and it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child as defined by Section 224.1.

(6) Any known sibling of the child who is the subject of the hearing if that sibling either is the subject of a dependency proceeding or has been adjudged to be a dependent child of the juvenile court. If the sibling is 10 years of age or older, the sibling, the sibling’s caregiver, and the sibling’s attorney. If the sibling is under 10 years of age, the sibling’s caregiver and the sibling’s attorney.
 However, notice is not required to be given to a sibling whose matter is calendared in the same court on the same day.

(7) The grandparents of the child, if their address is known and if the parent’s whereabouts are unknown.

(8) All counsel of record.

(9) To any unknown parent by publication, if ordered by the court pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(10) The current caregiver of the child, including foster parents, relative caregivers, preadoptive parents, nonrelative extended family members, or resource family. Any person notified may attend all hearings and may submit any information he or she deems relevant to the court in writing.

(b) The following persons shall not be notified of the hearing:

(1) A parent who has relinquished the child to the State Department of Social Services, county adoption agency, or licensed adoption agency for adoption, and the relinquishment has been accepted and filed with notice as required under Section 8700 of the Family Code.

(2) An alleged father who has denied paternity and has executed a waiver of the right to notice of further proceedings.

(3) A parent whose parental rights have been terminated.

(c) (1) Service of the notice shall be completed at least 45 days before the
 hearing date. Service is deemed complete at the time the notice is personally delivered to the person named in the
 notice, 10 days after the notice has been placed in the mail or sent by electronic mail, or at the expiration of the time prescribed by the order for publication.

(2) Service of notice in cases where publication is ordered shall be completed at least 30 days before the date of the hearing.

(d) Regardless of the type of notice required, or the manner in which it is served, once the court has made the initial finding that notice has properly been given to the parent, or to any person entitled to receive notice pursuant to this section, subsequent notice for continuation of a Section 366.26 hearing may be by first-class mail to any last known address, by an order made pursuant to Section 296, by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5, or by any other means that the
 court determines is reasonably calculated, under any circumstance, to provide notice of the continued hearing. However, if the recommendation changes from the recommendation contained in the notice previously found to be proper, notice shall be provided to the parent, and to any person entitled to receive notice pursuant to this section, regarding that subsequent hearing.

(e) The notice shall contain the following information:

(1) The date, time, and place of the hearing.

(2) The right to appear.

(3) The parents’ right to counsel.

(4) The nature of the proceedings.

(5) The recommendation of the supervising agency.

(6) A statement that, at the time of hearing, the court is required to select a permanent plan of adoption, legal guardianship, placement with a fit and willing relative, or another planned permanent living arrangement, as appropriate, for the child.

(f) Notice to the parents may be given in any one of the following manners:

(1) If the parent is present at the hearing at which the court schedules a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26, the court shall advise the parent of the date, time, and place of the proceedings, their right to counsel, the nature of the proceedings, and the requirement that at the proceedings
 the court shall select and implement a plan of adoption, legal guardianship, placement with a fit and willing relative, or another planned permanent living arrangement, as appropriate, for the child. The court shall direct the parent to appear for the proceedings and then direct that the parent be notified thereafter only by first-class mail to the parent’s usual place of residence or business or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.

(2) Certified mail, return receipt requested, to the parent’s last known mailing address. This notice shall be sufficient if the child welfare agency receives a return receipt signed by the parent.

(3) Personal service to the parent named in the notice.

(4) Delivery to a competent
 person who is at least 18 years of age at the parent’s usual place of residence or business, and thereafter served on the parent named in the notice by first-class mail at the place where the notice was delivered or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.

(5) If the residence of the parent is outside the state, service may be made as described in paragraph (1), (3), or (4) or by certified mail, return receipt requested.

(6) If the recommendation of the probation officer or social worker is legal guardianship, placement with a fit and willing relative, or another planned permanent living arrangement, as appropriate, service may be made by first-class mail to the parent’s usual place of residence or business or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5. In the case
 of an Indian child, if the recommendation of the probation officer or social worker is tribal customary adoption, service may be made by first-class mail to the parent’s usual place of residence or business.

(7) If a parent’s identity is known but his or her whereabouts are unknown and the parent cannot, with reasonable diligence, be served in any manner specified in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, the petitioner shall file an affidavit with the court at least 75 days before the hearing date, stating the name of the parent and describing the efforts made to locate and serve the parent.

(A) If the court determines that there has been due diligence in attempting to locate and serve the parent and the probation officer or social worker recommends adoption, service shall be to that parent’s
 attorney of record, if any, by certified mail, return receipt requested. If the parent does not have an attorney of record, the court shall order that service be made by publication of citation requiring the parent to appear at the date, time, and place stated in the citation and that the citation be published in a newspaper designated as most likely to give notice to the parent. Publication shall be made once a week for four consecutive weeks. Whether notice is to the attorney of record or by publication, the court shall also order that notice be given to the grandparents of the child, if their identities and addresses are known, by first-class mail or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.

(B) If the court determines that there has been due diligence in attempting to locate and serve the parent and the probation officer or social
 worker recommends legal guardianship, placement with a fit and willing relative, or another planned permanent living arrangement, as appropriate, no further notice is required to the parent, but the court shall order that notice be given to the grandparents of the child, if their identities and addresses are known, by first-class mail or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.

(C) In any case where the residence of the parent becomes known, notice shall immediately be served upon the parent as provided for in either paragraph (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6).

(g) (1) If the identity of one or both of the parents, or alleged parents, of the child is unknown, or if the name of one or both parents is uncertain, then that fact shall be set forth in the affidavit filed
 with the court at least 75 days before the hearing date, and the court, consistent with Sections 7665 and 7666 of the Family Code, shall issue an order dispensing with notice to a natural parent or possible natural parent under this section if, after inquiry and a determination that there has been due diligence in attempting to identify the unknown parent, the court is unable to identify the natural parent or possible natural parent and no person has appeared claiming to be the natural parent.

(2) After a determination that there has been due diligence in attempting to identify an unknown parent pursuant to paragraph (1) and the probation officer or social worker recommends adoption, the court shall consider whether publication notice would be likely to lead to actual notice to the unknown parent. The court may order publication notice if, on
 the basis of all information before the court, the court determines that notice by publication is likely to lead to actual notice to the parent. If publication notice to an unknown parent is ordered, the court shall order the published citation to be directed to either the father or mother, or both, of the child, and to all persons claiming to be the father or mother of the child, naming and otherwise describing the child. An order of publication pursuant to this paragraph shall be based on an affidavit describing efforts made to identify the unknown parent or parents. Service made by publication pursuant to this paragraph shall require the unknown parent or parents to appear at the date, time, and place stated in the citation. Publication shall be made once a week for four consecutive weeks.

(3) If the court determines that there has been
 due diligence in attempting to identify one or both of the parents, or alleged parents, of the child and the probation officer or social worker recommends legal guardianship, placement with a fit and willing relative, or another planned permanent living arrangement, as appropriate, no further notice to the parent shall be required.

(h) Notice to all counsel of record shall be by first-class mail or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.

(i) If it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1, notice shall be given in accordance with Section 224.3.

(j) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the attorney of record is present at the time the court schedules a
 hearing pursuant to Section 366.26, no further notice is required, except as required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (f).

(k) This section shall also apply to children adjudged wards pursuant to Section 727.31.

(l) The court shall state the reasons on the record explaining why good cause exists for granting any continuance of a hearing held pursuant to Section 366.26 to fulfill the requirements of this section.

(m) Notice of any hearing at which the county welfare department is recommending the termination of parental rights may only be served electronically if notice is also given by another means of service provided for in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 126.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

295.

The social worker or probation officer shall give notice of review hearings held pursuant to Sections 366.3 and 366.31 and for termination of jurisdiction hearings held pursuant to Section 391 in the following manner:

(a) Notice of the hearing shall be given to the following persons:

(1) The mother.

(2) The presumed father.

(3) The legal guardian or guardians.

(4) The Indian custodian, if it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1.

(5) The child, if the child is 10 years of age or older, or a nonminor dependent.

(6) The child’s tribe, if it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1.

(7) Any known sibling of the child or nonminor dependent who is the subject of the hearing if that sibling either is the subject of a dependency proceeding or has been adjudged to be a dependent child of the juvenile court. If the sibling is 10 years of age or older, the sibling, the sibling’s caregiver, and the sibling’s attorney. If the sibling is under 10 years of age, the sibling’s caregiver and the sibling’s attorney. However, notice is not required to be given to any sibling whose matter is calendared in the same court on the same day.

(8) The
 current caregiver of the child, including the foster parents, relative caregivers, preadoptive parents, nonrelative extended family members, resource family, community care facility, or foster family agency having physical custody of the child if a child is removed from the physical custody of the parents or legal guardian. The person notified may attend all hearings and may submit any information he or she deems relevant to the court in writing.

(9) The current caregiver of a nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400. The person notified may attend all hearings and may submit for filing an original and eight copies of written information he or she deems relevant to the court. The court clerk shall provide the current parties and attorneys of record with a copy of the written information immediately upon receipt and complete, file, and distribute a proof of service.

(10) The attorney of record if that attorney of record was not present at the time that the hearing was set by the court.

(11) The alleged father or fathers, but only if the recommendation is to set a new hearing pursuant to Section 366.26.

(b) No notice shall be required for a parent whose parental rights have been terminated or for the parent of a nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, unless the parent is receiving court-ordered family reunification services pursuant to Section 361.6.

(c) The notice of the review hearing shall be served no earlier than 30 days, nor later than 15 days, before the hearing.

(d) The notice of the review hearing shall contain a statement regarding the nature of the hearing to be
 held, any recommended change in the custody or status of the child, and any recommendation that the court set a new hearing pursuant to Section 366.26 in order to select a more permanent plan.

(e) Service of notice shall be by first-class mail addressed to the last known address of the person to be provided notice or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.

(f) If the child is ordered into a permanent plan of legal guardianship, and subsequently a petition to terminate or modify the guardianship is filed, the probation officer or social worker shall serve notice of the petition not less than 15 court days before the hearing on all persons listed in subdivision (a) and on the court that established legal guardianship if it is in another county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 15.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

296.

Upon any hearing or rehearing under this article, the court may order the child or any parent or guardian, or Indian custodian of the child who is present in court, to again appear before the court, before the social worker or probation officer, or before the county financial officer at a time and place specified in the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 416, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

297.

(a) (1) A subsequent petition filed pursuant to Section 342 shall be noticed pursuant to Sections 290.1 and 290.2, except that service may be delivered by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.

(2) If it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1, notice of the adjudication and disposition hearings on the subsequent petition shall be given in accordance with Section 224.3.

(b) (1) Upon the filing of a supplemental petition pursuant to Section 387, the clerk of the juvenile court shall immediately set the matter for hearing within 30 days of the date of the filing, and the social worker or probation
 officer shall cause notice thereof to be served upon the persons required by, and in the manner prescribed by, Sections 290.1, 290.2, and 291, except that service may be delivered by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.

(2) If it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1, notice of the adjudication and disposition hearings on the supplemental petition shall be given in accordance with Section 224.3.

(c) (1) If a petition for modification has been filed pursuant to Section 388, and it appears that the best interest of the child may be promoted by the proposed change of the order, the recognition of a sibling relationship, or the termination of jurisdiction, the court shall order that a hearing be held and shall give prior notice, or cause prior notice to be given, to the social worker or
 probation officer and to the child’s attorney of record, or if there is no attorney of record for the child, to the child, his or her parent or parents or legal guardian or guardians or Indian custodian, and the child’s tribe in the manner prescribed by Section 291 unless a different manner is prescribed by the court.

(2) If it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1, and the hearing on the petition for modification pursuant to Section 388 may culminate in an order for foster care placement, termination of parental rights, preadoptive placement, or adoptive placement, notice shall be given in accordance with Section 224.3.

(d) On and after January 1, 2012, if a petition for modification has been filed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 by a nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, no
 notice is required for a parent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 16.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Dependent Children—Jurisdiction [300. - 304.7.]

300.

A child who comes within any of the following descriptions is within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court which may adjudge that person to be a dependent child of the court:

(a) The child has suffered, or there is a substantial risk that the child will suffer, serious physical harm inflicted nonaccidentally upon the child by the child’s parent or guardian. For purposes of this subdivision, a court may find there is a substantial risk of serious future injury based on the manner in which a less serious injury was inflicted, a history of repeated inflictions of injuries on the child or the child’s siblings, or a combination of these and other actions by the parent or guardian that indicate the child is at risk of
 serious physical harm. For purposes of this subdivision, “serious physical harm” does not include reasonable and age-appropriate spanking to the buttocks if there is no evidence of serious physical injury.

(b) (1) The child has suffered, or there is a substantial risk that the child will suffer, serious physical harm or illness, as a result of any of the following:

(A) The failure or inability of the child’s parent or guardian to adequately supervise or protect the child.

(B) The willful or negligent failure of the child’s parent or guardian to adequately supervise or protect the child from the conduct of the custodian with whom the child has been left.

(C) The willful or negligent failure of the parent or guardian to provide the child with adequate food, clothing, shelter, or medical treatment.

(D) The inability of the parent or guardian to provide regular care for the child due to the parent’s or guardian’s mental illness, developmental disability, or substance abuse.

(2) A child shall not be found to be a person described by this subdivision solely due to any of the following:

(A) Homelessness or the lack of an emergency shelter for the family.

(B) The failure of the child’s parent or alleged parent to seek court orders for custody of the child.

(C) Indigence or other conditions of financial difficulty, including, but not limited to, poverty, the inability to provide or obtain clothing, home or property repair, or childcare.

(3) Whenever it is alleged that a child comes within the jurisdiction of the court on the basis of the parent’s or guardian’s willful failure to provide adequate medical treatment or specific decision to provide spiritual treatment through prayer, the court shall give deference to the parent’s or guardian’s medical treatment, nontreatment, or spiritual treatment through prayer alone in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination, by an accredited practitioner thereof, and shall not assume jurisdiction unless necessary to protect the child from suffering serious physical harm or illness. In making its determination, the court shall consider (1) the nature of the treatment proposed by the parent or guardian, (2) the risks to the child posed by the course of treatment or nontreatment proposed by
 the parent or guardian, (3) the risk, if any, of the course of treatment being proposed by the petitioning agency, and (4) the likely success of the courses of treatment or nontreatment proposed by the parent or guardian and agency. The child shall continue to be a dependent child pursuant to this subdivision only so long as is necessary to protect the child from risk of suffering serious physical harm or illness.

(4) The Legislature finds and declares that a child who is sexually trafficked, as described in Section 236.1 of the Penal Code, or who receives food or shelter in exchange for, or who is paid to perform, sexual acts described in Section 236.1 or 11165.1 of the Penal Code, and whose parent or guardian failed to, or was unable to, protect the child, is within the description of this subdivision, and that this finding is declaratory
 of existing law. These children shall be known as commercially sexually exploited children.

(c) The child is suffering serious emotional damage, or is at substantial risk of suffering serious emotional damage, evidenced by severe anxiety, depression, withdrawal, or untoward aggressive behavior toward self or others, as a result of the conduct of the parent or guardian or who has no parent or guardian capable of providing appropriate care. A child shall not be found to be a person described by this subdivision if the willful failure of the parent or guardian to provide adequate mental health treatment is based on a sincerely held religious belief and if a less intrusive judicial intervention is available.

(d) The child has been sexually abused, or there is a substantial risk
 that the child will be sexually abused, as defined in Section 11165.1 of the Penal Code, by the child’s parent or guardian or a member of the child’s household, or the parent or guardian has failed to adequately protect the child from sexual abuse when the parent or guardian knew or reasonably should have known that the child was in danger of sexual abuse.

(e) The child is under five years of age and has suffered severe physical abuse by a parent, or by any person known by the parent, if the parent knew or reasonably should have known that the person was physically abusing the child. For the purposes of this subdivision, “severe physical abuse” means any of the following: any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of sufficient severity that, if left untreated, would cause permanent physical disfigurement, permanent physical
 disability, or death; any single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or unconsciousness; or the willful, prolonged failure to provide adequate food. A child shall not be removed from the physical custody of the child’s parent or guardian on the basis of a finding of severe physical abuse unless the social worker has made an allegation of severe physical abuse pursuant to Section 332.

(f) The child’s parent or guardian caused the death of another child through abuse or neglect.

(g) The child has been left without any provision for support; physical custody of
 the child has been voluntarily surrendered pursuant to Section 1255.7 of the Health and Safety Code and the child has not been reclaimed within the 14-day period specified in subdivision (g) of that section; the child’s parent has been incarcerated or institutionalized and cannot arrange for the care of the child; or a relative or other adult custodian with whom the child resides or has been left is unwilling or unable to provide care or support for the child, the whereabouts of the parent are unknown, and reasonable efforts to locate the parent have been unsuccessful.

(h) The child has been freed for adoption by one or both parents for 12 months by either relinquishment or termination of parental rights or an adoption petition has not been granted.

(i) The child has been subjected to
 an act or acts of cruelty by the parent or guardian or a member of the child’s household, or the parent or guardian has failed to adequately protect the child from an act or acts of cruelty when the parent or guardian knew or reasonably should have known that the child was in danger of being subjected to an act or acts of cruelty.

(j) The child’s sibling has been abused or neglected, as defined in subdivision (a), (b), (d), (e), or (i), and there is a substantial risk that the child will be abused or neglected, as defined in those subdivisions. The court shall consider the circumstances surrounding the abuse or neglect of the sibling, the age and gender of each child, the nature of the abuse or neglect of the sibling, the mental condition of the parent or guardian, and any other factors the court considers probative in determining whether there
 is a substantial risk to the child.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this section not disrupt the family unnecessarily or intrude inappropriately into family life, prohibit the use of reasonable methods of parental discipline, or prescribe a particular method of parenting. Further, this section is not intended to limit the offering of voluntary services to those families in need of assistance but who do not come within the descriptions of this section. To the extent that savings accrue to the state from child welfare services funding obtained as a result of the enactment of the act that enacted this section, those savings shall be used to promote services which support family maintenance and family reunification plans, such as client transportation, out-of-home respite care, parenting training, and the provision of temporary or emergency in-home
 caretakers and persons teaching and demonstrating homemaking skills. The Legislature further declares that a physical disability, such as blindness or deafness, is no bar to the raising of happy and well-adjusted children and that a court’s determination pursuant to this section shall center upon whether a parent’s disability prevents the parent from exercising care and control. The Legislature further declares that a child whose parent has been adjudged a dependent child of the court pursuant to this section shall not be considered to be at risk of abuse or neglect solely because of the age, dependent status, or foster care status of the parent.

As used in this section, “guardian” means the legal guardian of the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 832, Sec. 1.   (SB 1085)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

300.1.

Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 361 and Section 16507, family reunification services shall not be provided to a child adjudged a dependent pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 300.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1054, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

300.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the purpose of the provisions of this chapter relating to dependent children is to provide maximum safety and protection for children who are currently being physically, sexually, or emotionally abused, being neglected, or being exploited, and to ensure the safety, protection, and physical and emotional well-being of children who are at risk of that harm. This safety, protection, and physical and emotional well-being may include provision of a full array of social and health services to help the child and family and to prevent
 reabuse of children. The focus shall be on the preservation of the family as well as the safety, protection, and physical and emotional well-being of the child. The provision of a home environment free from the negative effects of substance abuse is a necessary condition for the safety, protection and physical and emotional well-being of the child. Successful participation in a treatment program for substance abuse may be considered in evaluating the home environment. In addition, the provisions of this chapter ensuring the confidentiality of proceedings and records are intended to protect the privacy rights of the child.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that families should not be subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court nor should children be separated from their parents based on conditions of financial difficulty, including, but not limited to,
 a lack of food, clothing, shelter or childcare. Reasonable services to prevent juvenile court intervention or children being separated from their parents include services to alleviate a potential risk to a child based on conditions of financial difficulty, including, but not limited to, referrals to community-based organizations. Consistent with existing law, no family should be subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court nor should children be separated from their parents based on conditions of financial difficulty unless there is willful or negligent action or failure to act and a nexus to harm such that the child has suffered or there is a substantial risk the child will suffer serious physical harm or illness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 832, Sec. 2.   (SB 1085)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

300.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 215 or 272, or any other provision of law, a child or nonminor whose jurisdiction is modified pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 607.2 or subdivision (i) of Section 727.2 and who is placed in foster care may be supervised by the probation department of the county in which the court with jurisdiction over the dependent is located, if the county protocol in that county requires it. In those counties, all case management, case plan review, and reporting functions as described in Sections 671 and 675 of Title 42 of the United States Code and contained in this article shall be performed by the probation officer for these dependents.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 459, Sec. 6.   (AB 212)   Effective October 4, 2011.   Section initially operative January 1, 2012, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

300.5.

In any case in which a child is alleged to come within the provisions of Section 300 on the basis that he or she is in need of medical care, the court, in making that finding, shall give consideration to any treatment being provided to the child by spiritual means through prayer alone in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination by an accredited practitioner thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1054, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

301.
